Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.61.030

Defrauding a public utility in the first degree.

(1) A person is guilty of defrauding a public utility in the first degree if:

(a) The utility service diverted or used exceeds one thousand five hundred dollars in value; or

(b) Tampering has occurred in furtherance of other criminal activity.

(2) Defrauding a public utility in the first degree is a class B felony.

[ 1989 c 109 s 3.]